District of Columbia statutes.
39-402.01

Continuing authorization to provide public support.

Subject to the appropriation of funds or the identification of legally available funds, the Mayor may provide economic assistance to pay all or a portion of the capital costs incurred by a project approved by the Council prior to November 1, 2009.

History

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-271, § 3a
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 7181(b), 57 DCR 181

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7181(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7181(b), of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).